Alaska, session 34, HB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 42.05 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 42.05.323. Portable solar generation devices. (a) A portable solar 06 generation device is exempt from utility interconnection and net metering program 07 requirements adopted by the commission if the device 08 (1) has a maximum power output of not more than 1,200 watts; 09 (2) meets the standards of the most recent version of the National 10 Electrical Code; and 11 (3) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent 12 nationally recognized testing laboratory. 13 (b) An electric utility may not require a customer using a portable solar 14 generation device that meets the requirements of (a) of this section to 01 (1) obtain the electric utility's approval before installing or using the 02 device; 03 (2) pay a fee or charge related to the device; or 04 (3) install additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated 05 into the device. 06 (c) An electric utility is not liable for any damage or injury caused by a 07 portable solar generation device that meets the requirements in (a) of this section. 08 (d) In this section, "portable solar generation device" means a moveable 09 photovoltaic generation device that is designed to be 10 (1) connected to a building's electrical system through a standard 120- 11 volt alternating current outlet; and 12 (2) used primarily to offset part of an electric utility customer's 13 electricity consumption. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.